Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2411
Owner or tenant of lot; solicit or
accept compensation from tower; prohibited.

Any owner or
tenant causing the towing away of a vehicle
shall not solicit or accept therefor a commission, gift, gratuity, or any
form of compensation or wealth from the person or business towing away the vehicle.

Laws 1979, LB 348, § 11;

Laws 2010, LB1065, § 11.